Mississippi, session 2026, HB4156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Marshall County, Mississippi, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to contribute an amount not to exceed Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) each fiscal year beginning in fiscal year 2026/2027 and ending no later than the end of fiscal year 2027/2028, to the Byhalia Area Arts Council, a qualified charitable 501(c)(3) organization. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.